New Jersey, session 221, S4051.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) As used in P.L.    , c. (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), school security specialist means a person meeting the requirements of section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), who is employed by a private company that engages in the business of providing, or undertaking to provide, school security services to schools. A school security specialist also may include a school district employee or any other private individual not employed by a private company that engages in the business of providing, or undertaking to provide, school security services to schools, who otherwise meets the requirements of section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) and successfully completes the training requirements to be a school security specialist. 2.    (New section) a. A school district may, as it deems necessary, appoint a school security specialist to provide school security services to schools of the district. The appointment of a school security specialist shall not be construed to relieve a school district of its requirement to designate a school safety specialist pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2017, c. 162 (C.18A:17-43.3). b. A person shall not be appointed as a school security specialist, unless the person: (1) is sound in body and of good health; (2) is of good moral character; (3) possesses a minimum of 20 years of prior experience in law enforcement having served in a supervisory capacity during that time and having been separated from that prior experience in good standing; (4) possesses a valid New Jersey drivers license; (5) is employed by a licensed security officer company under the Security Officer Registration Act, P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A et seq.); and (6) is registered as a security officer under the Security Officer Registration Act, P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A-1 et seq.). c. Prior to an appointment to a school district as a school security specialist, a person shall: (1) undergo a criminal history record check in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1986, c.116 (C.18A:6-7.1 et seq.); (2) successfully complete the training program developed pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill); (3) successfully complete the training course developed pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2005, c.276 (C.52:17B-71.8). d. Upon the recommendation of the superintendent of schools, a local board of education may permit a school security specialist to carry a handgun in school buildings and on school grounds. A school security specialist shall only be permitted to carry a handgun pursuant to this subsection if the school security specialist: (1) complies with the requirements set forth in subsection l. of N.J.S.2C:39-6 authorizing a retired law enforcement officer to carry a handgun; or (2) obtains a valid permit to carry a handgun pursuant to N.J.S.2C:58-4; and (3) in accordance with the provisions of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C-39-5, obtains written authorization to possess a firearm in or upon any part of the buildings or grounds of any school; and e. A school security specialist appointed by a school district may, pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection c. of section 1 of P.L.1982, c.79 (C.2A:4A-60), be deemed by the principal of a school in the district as a staff member responsible for maintaining order, safety, or discipline in the school who is authorized to receive information as to the identity, charge, adjudication, and disposition of a juvenile charged with an offense. f. A school security specialist appointed by a school district shall be authorized by the district to participate in the exchange of information provided for under the Uniform State Memorandum of Agreement Between Education and Law Enforcement Officials, or any other successor agreement. 3. (New section) a. The Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, shall develop, and modify accordingly, a training program for school security specialists, which shall be reflective of current school security policy and best practices. The Commissioner of Education or the commissioners designee may certify a school or private entity to provide and administer the training program. A person shall successfully complete the training program prior to being appointed as a school security specialist pursuant to section 2 of P.L. , c. (C. )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). The training shall include: (1) multi-hazard emergency planning for schools; (2) active shooter response training; (3) advanced firearms training; (4) information on the Uniform State Memorandum of Agreement Between Education and Law Enforcement Officials, or any other successor agreement; (5) professional conduct within a school environment; (6) conflict management and de-escalation training; and (7) training to recognize behavioral issues and care/handling of the same. b.    A school security specialist shall periodically undergo the training established pursuant to subsection a. of this section in accordance with a schedule to be established by the Commissioner of Education. Notwithstanding the schedule established by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection, a school security specialist shall on an annual basis undergo the active shooter response training required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section and the advanced firearms training required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection a. of this section. c.     The curriculum shall be reviewed every two years by the Department of Education in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General to ensure training incorporates best practices in the area of school security. 4.    Section 1 of P.L.2017, c.162 (C.18A:17-43.2) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. There is established in the Department of Education the New Jersey School Safety Specialist and School Security Specialist Academy. It shall be the purpose of the academy to serve as a central repository for best practices, training standards, and compliance oversight in all matters regarding school safety and security, including prevention efforts, intervention efforts, and emergency preparedness planning. The academy shall: provide, free of charge, ongoing professional development on national and State best practices, as well as the most current resources on school safety and security; assume a lead role in setting the vision for school safety and security in the State; and provide a coordinated and interdisciplinary approach to providing technical assistance and guidance to schools throughout the State. b.    The academy shall develop and implement a School Safety Specialist and School Security Specialist Certification Program. A school safety specialist appointed pursuant to section 2 of [this act] P.L.2017, c.162 (C.18A:17-43.3) and a school security specialist appointed pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.     )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be required to acquire the certification. The certification program shall provide training, free of charge, to newly-appointed school safety specialists and school security specialists in the areas of bullying, hazing, truancy, Internet safety, emergency planning, emergency drills, drugs, weapons, gangs and school policing, and any other areas deemed necessary by the academy. The academy shall also offer annual training sessions for certified school safety specialists and school security specialists. The academy shall develop training modules in both traditional and online formats. (cf: P.L.2017, c.162, s.1) 5.    Section 2 of P.L.2005, c.276 (C.52:17B-71.8) is amended to read as follows: 2.  a. The Police Training Commission in the Division of Criminal Justice in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall develop a training course for safe schools resource officers and public school employees assigned by a board of education to serve as a school liaison to law enforcement. The Attorney General, in conjunction with the Police Training Commission, shall ensure that the training course is developed within 180 days of the effective date of this act and P.L. , c. (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). The course shall at a minimum provide comprehensive and consistent training in current school resource officer practices and concepts. The course shall include training in the protection of students from harassment, intimidation, and bullying, including incidents which occur through electronic communication. The course shall be made available to: (1) any law enforcement officer or public school employee referred by the board of education of the public school to which assignment as a safe schools resource officer or school liaison to law enforcement is sought; [and] (2) any safe schools resource officer or school liaison to law enforcement assigned to a public school prior to the effective date of P.L.2005, c.276 (C.52:17B-71.8 et al.) ; and (3) any school security specialist appointed by a school district pursuant to section 2 of P.L. , c. (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The training course developed by the commission pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be offered at each school approved by the commission to provide police training courses pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-66 et seq.). The commission shall ensure that an individual assigned to instruct the course is proficient and experienced in current school resource officer practices and concepts. c.     The commission shall award a certificate to each individual who successfully completes the course. d.    The Police Training Commission, in consultation with the Commissioner of Education, shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to implement the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2010, c.122, s.15) 6.    This act shall take effect on the 180th day following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Education may take any anticipatory action prior to the effective date needed for the timely implementation of the act.